Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.394

Certificate of authority from department of financial institutions—Filing of records.

For any corporation or other entity that has, is applying for, or intends to apply for a certificate of authority from the department of financial institutions as a bank, trust company, or the holding company thereof, under *Title 30 RCW, or as a savings bank or holding company thereof, under Title 32 RCW, or for any other corporation or other entity which is or purports to be a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, trust company, industrial loan bank, credit union, bank holding company, financial holding company, or savings and loan holding company, whenever under this chapter corporate records are required to be filed with the secretary of state, the records shall be filed with the department of financial institutions.

[ 2010 c 88 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Title 30 RCW was recodified and/or repealed pursuant to 2014 c 37, effective January 5, 2015.

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.